Massachusetts, session 194th, H4522.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 39 of the General Laws, or any other general or
special law or charter provision to the contrary, the Town of Concord may hold Town Meetings
and Special Town Meetings with voters located in a common, physical location in-person, fully
remotely, or through a hybrid of a remote and in-person format.
SECTION 2. Any Town meeting held completely remotely or in hybrid form in
accordance with this act shall be recorded and the recording shall be made available for public
viewing on the town's website, or another publicly available video platform for at least 30 days
following the conclusion of the meeting. The recording shall also be a public record of the Town,
subject to disclosure upon request.
of 2

SECTION 3. All actions taken at a remote or hybrid Town Meeting held in accordance
with this act shall have the same effect as if the Town Meeting had been conducted entirely in
person.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2